fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Sécurité des véhicules > Équipement de protection pour aéronefs: Combinaisons anti-G pour avions; Systèmes d’oxygène d’urgence pour avions; Parachutes de secours pour avions; Équipement de lutte contre les incendies d’aéronefs; Combinaisons de vol de sécurité pour les avions; Gilets de sauvetage pour compagnies aériennes; Casques de pilote
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка и товары для обеспечения безопасности транспортных средств > Защитное оборудование для летательных аппаратов: Противоперегрузочные костюмы для летательных аппаратов; Системы аварийного снабжения кислородом для летательных аппаратов; Аварийные парашюты для летательных аппаратов; Средства пожаротушения для летательных аппаратов; Костюмы для обеспечения безопасности полетов; Спасательные жилеты для авиалиний; Шлемы пилотов
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Sigurnost i zaštita vozila > Zrakoplovna zaštitna oprema: Zrakoplovna antigravitacijska odijela; Zrakoplovni sustavi kisika u hitnim slučajevima; Zrakoplovni pomoćni padobrani; Zrakoplovna oprema za suzbijanje požara; Zaštitni zrakoplovni letački kombinezoni; Zrakoplovni prsluci za spašavanje; Pilotske kacige
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonssäkerhet > Skyddsutrustning för flygplan: Flygplans Anti-G-dräkter; Flygplans nödsyresystem; Nödfallskärmar för flygplan; Brandsläckningsutrustning för flygplan; Flygdräkter för flygsäkerhet; Flygbolagsflytvästar; Pilothjälmar
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Bezpečnosť a zabezpečenie vozidla > Ochranné vybavenie lietadla: Letecké obleky Anti-G; Letecké núdzové kyslíkové systémy; Letecké núdzové padáky; Výstroj na potlačenie požiaru lietadla; Letecké bezpečnostné obleky; Záchranné vesty leteckých spoločností; Pilotné prilby
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Safety & Security > Aircraft Protective Gear: Aircraft Anti-G Suits; Aircraft Emergency Oxygen Systems; Aircraft Emergency Parachutes; Aircraft Fire Suppression Gear; Aircraft Safety Flight Suits; Airline Life Vests; Pilot Helmets
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ความปลอดภัยและการรักษาความปลอดภัยรถยนต์ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันเครื่องบิน: ชุดป้องกันแรงสั่นสะเทือนจากเครื่องบิน; ระบบออกซิเจนฉุกเฉินบนเครื่องบิน; ร่มชูชีพฉุกเฉินสำหรับเครื่องบิน; อุปกรณ์ดับเพลิงเครื่องบิน; ชุดนักบินเพื่อความปลอดภัยบนเครื่องบิน; เสื้อชูชีพบนเครื่องบิน; หมวกนักบิน
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 车辆安全防盗用品 > 飞机防护装备: 飞机抗荷服; 飞机应急氧气系统; 飞机应急降落伞; 飞机灭火装备; 飞机安全飞行服; 航空救生衣; 飞行员头盔
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Безопасност и сигурност на превозни средства > Самолетно защитно оборудване: Самолетни антигравитационни костюми; Самолетни аварийни кислородни системи; Самолетни аварийни парашути; Самолетно оборудване за потушаване на пожар; Самолетни предпазни летателни костюми; Самолетни спасителни жилетки; Пилотски каски
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Zabezpieczenia pojazdów > Sprzęt ochronny do samolotów: Skafandry przeciwprzeciążeniowe do samolotów; Awaryjne systemy tlenowe do samolotów; Spadochrony ratunkowe do samolotów; Sprzęt przeciwpożarowy do samolotów; Kombinezony lotnicze do samolotów; Lotnicze kamizelki ratunkowe; Kaski pilota
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 안전/보안 > 항공기 보호 장비: 항공기 안티-G 슈트; 항공기 비상 산소 시스템; 항공기 비상 낙하산; 항공기 화재 진압 장비; 항공기 안전 비행복; 항공사 구명조끼; 파일럿 헬멧
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ασφάλεια & προστασία οχημάτων > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός αεροσκαφών: Στολές αντι-G αεροσκαφών; Έκτακτα συστήματα οξυγόνου αεροσκαφών; Αλεξίπτωτα έκτακτης ανάγκης αεροσκαφών; Εξοπλισμός κατάσβεσης πυρκαγιών αεροσκαφών; Στολές πτήσης ασφαλείας αεροσκαφών; Σωσίβια αεροπορικής εταιρείας; Κράνη πιλότων
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Veiligheid en bescherming voor voertuigen > Beschermende uitrusting voor vliegtuigen: Anti-G-pakken voor vliegtuigen; Noodzuurstofsystemen voor vliegtuigen; Noodparachutes voor vliegtuigen; Brandblusuitrusting voor vliegtuigen; Veiligheidsvluchtpakken voor vliegtuigen; Reddingsvesten voor luchtvaartmaatschappijen; Pilotenhelmen
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物の安全・防犯関連用品 > 航空機用プロテクター: 航空機用耐Gスーツ; 航空機緊急酸素システム; 航空機緊急パラシュート; 航空機消火装置; 航空機安全フライトスーツ; 航空会社の救命胴衣; パイロットヘルメット
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Segurança de veículos > Equipamento de proteção para aeronaves: Trajes anti-G para aeronaves; Sistemas de oxigênio de emergência para aeronaves; Paraquedas de emergência para aeronaves; Equipamento de combate a incêndio em aeronaves; Macacões de voo de segurança para aeronaves; Coletes salva-vidas para companhias aéreas; Capacetes para pilotos
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Siguranța și securitatea vehiculelor > Echipamente de protecție pentru aeronave: Costume anti-G pentru aeronave; Sisteme de oxigen de urgență pentru avioane; Parașute de urgență pentru avioane; Echipament de stingere a incendiilor pentru avioane; Costume de zbor pentru siguranța aeronavelor; Veste de salvare pentru aeronave; Căști pentru piloți
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműbiztonság és -védelem > Repülőgép-védőfelszerelés: Anti-G repülőgépruhák; Vészhelyzeti Repülőgép-oxigénrendszerek; Vészhelyzeti repülőgép-ejtőernyők; Tűzoltó repülőgép-felszerelés; Repülőgép-biztonsági repülési ruhák; Repülőgép-mentőmellények; Pilótasisakok
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Køretøjssikkerhed > Beskyttelsesudstyr til fly: Anti-G-dragter til flyvemaskiner; Nødiltsystemer til flyvemaskiner; Nødfaldskærme til flyvemaskiner; Brandslukningsudstyr til flyvemaskiner; Sikkerhedsflyverdragter til flyvemaskiner; Redningsveste til flyselskabet; Pilothjelme
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Güvenliği ve Emniyeti > Hava Taşıtı Koruyucu Kıyafetleri: Hava Taşıtı G Elbiseleri; Hava Taşıtı Acil Durum Oksijen Sistemleri; Hava Taşıtı Acil Durum Paraşütleri; Hava Taşıtı Yangın Söndürme Ekipmanı; Hava Taşıtı Güvenli Uçuş Tulumları; Hava Yolu İçin Can Yelekleri; Pilot Kaskları
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Bezpečnost a zabezpečení vozidel > Letecké ochranné vybavení: Letecké anti-G obleky; Nouzové kyslíkové systémy pro letadla; Letecké záchranné padáky; Vybavení pro hašení požáru v letadle; Letecké bezpečnostní kombinézy; Záchranné vesty leteckých společností; Přilby pro piloty
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛安全 > 飛機護具: 航空抗 G 力衣; 航空緊急氧氣系統; 航空緊急降落傘; 航空滅火器; 飛機飛行安全服裝; 航空救生衣; 飛行頭盔
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Sicurezza e protezioni per veicoli > Equipaggiamento protettivo per aeromobili: Tute anti-G per aeromobili; Sistemi di ossigeno di emergenza per aeromobili; Paracaduti di emergenza per aeromobili; Attrezzatura antincendio per aeromobili; Tute da volo di sicurezza per aeromobili; Giubbotti di salvataggio per aerei; Caschi da pilota
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Segurança e proteção para veículos > Equipamento de proteção para aeronaves: Fatos anti-G para aeronaves; Sistemas de oxigênio de emergência para aeronaves; Paraquedas de emergência para aeronaves; Equipamento de combate a incêndio em aeronaves; Fatos de voo de segurança para aeronaves; Coletes salva vidas de aviação; Capacetes de piloto
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøysikkerhet > Beskyttelsesutstyr for fly: Anti-G-drakter til fly; Nødoksygensystemer for fly; Nødfallskjermer for fly; Brannslokkingsutstyr for fly; Flyverdrakt; Redningsvester for fly; Pilothjelmer
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Varnost in zaščita vozil > Zaščitna oprema za letala: Antigravitacijske letalske obleke; Sistemi za uporabo kisika na letalu v sili; Varnostna padala za letala; Zaščitna oprema za gašenje požarov v letalih; Zaščitne letalske obleke; Reševalni jopiči za letalske družbe; Pilotske čelade
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > An toàn và an ninh xe cộ > Thiết bị bảo vệ máy bay: Bộ đồ chống trọng lực của máy bay; Hệ thống oxy khẩn cấp trên máy bay; Dù khẩn cấp trên máy bay; Thiết bị chữa cháy máy bay; Bộ đồ bay an toàn cho máy bay; Áo phao cứu sinh của hãng hàng không; Mũ bảo hiểm phi công
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Seguridad y protección para vehículos > Equipo de protección para aviones: Trajes antigravedad para aviones; Sistemas de oxígeno de emergencia para aviones; Paracaídas de emergencia para aviones; Equipo de extinción de incendios para aviones; Trajes de vuelo de seguridad para aviones; Chalecos salvavidas para aviones; Cascos de piloto
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Fahrzeugsicherheit > Schutzausrüstung für Luftfahrzeuge: Anti-G-Anzüge; Notfall-Sauerstoffsysteme für Flugzeuge; Flugzeug-Rettungsfallschirm; Feuerlöschausrüstung für Flugzeuge; Sicherheits-Fliegeranzüge; Rettungswesten für Fluggesellschaften; Pilotenhelme
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Ajoneuvon turvallisuus > Ilma-aluksen suojavarusteet: Ilma-aluksen painovoimattomiin olosuhteisiin tarkoitetut puvut; Ilma-aluksen hätähappijärjestelmät; Ilma-aluksen hätälaskuvarjot; Ilma-aluksen palontorjuntavarusteet; Ilma-aluksen lentoturva-asut; Lentoyhtiön pelastusliivit; Lentäjän kypärät
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių sauga ir apsauga > Orlaivio apsauginės priemonės: Orlaivių antigenų kostiumai; Orlaivių avarinės deguonies sistemos; Orlaivių avariniai parašiutai; Orlaivių gaisro gesinimo įranga; Orlaivių saugaus skrydžio kostiumai; Oro linijų gelbėjimosi liemenės; Pilotų šalmai